Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that individuals living with traumatic brain injuries face significant barriers to accessing necessary support services, community integration programs, and peer-led recovery opportunities. The legislature acknowledges that traumatic brain injuries can lead to long-term cognitive, emotional, and physical challenges, often resulting in social isolation, difficulty in maintaining employment, and limited access to rehabilitation services. Additionally, family members and caregivers of individuals with a traumatic brain injury require ongoing support and guidance to navigate the complexities of available resources. Recent trends indicate that allocations have disproportionately favored virtual education and state-affiliated programs, leaving direct peer-to-peer groups and community-based support underfunded. The disappearance of many in-person support groups, due to financial constraints, has severely limited opportunities for individuals with a traumatic brain injury to connect, build essential life skills, and engage in meaningful recovery-focused activities.The legislature recognizes the urgent need to rebalance funding priorities to ensure that in-person support groups and community integration programs are adequately supported.Sec. 2. RCW 46.63.110 and 2024 c 308 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed $250 for each offense unless authorized by this chapter or title.(b) The court may waive or remit any monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation associated with a traffic infraction unless the specific monetary obligation in question is prohibited from being waived or remitted by state law.(2) The monetary penalty for a violation of (a) RCW 46.55.105(2) is $250 for each offense; (b) RCW 46.61.210(1) is $500 for each offense. No penalty assessed under this subsection (2) may be reduced.(3) The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.(4) There shall be a penalty of $25 for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body may set a monetary penalty not to exceed $25 for failure to respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by the local legislative body.(5) Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to this chapter.(6) Whenever a monetary penalty, fee, cost, assessment, or other monetary obligation is imposed by a court under this chapter, it is immediately payable and is enforceable as a civil judgment under Title 6 RCW. If the court determines that a person is not able to pay a monetary obligation in full, the court shall enter into a payment plan with the person in accordance with RCW 46.63.190 and standards that may be set out in court rule.(7) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed:(a) A fee of $5 per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW 70.168.040;(b) A fee of $10 per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund; and(c) A fee of (($5))$10 per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the traumatic brain injury account established in RCW 74.31.060.(8)(a) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have committed a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.527 or 46.61.212 shall be assessed an additional penalty of $24. The court may not reduce, waive, or suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to be indigent. If a court authorized community restitution program for offenders is available in the jurisdiction, the court shall allow offenders to offset all or a part of the penalty due under this subsection (8) by participation in the court authorized community restitution program.(b) $12.50 of the additional penalty under (a) of this subsection shall be remitted to the state treasurer. The remaining revenue from the additional penalty must be remitted under chapters 2.08, 3.46, 3.50, 3.62, 10.82, and 35.20 RCW. Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer must be deposited as follows: $8.50 in the state general fund and $4 in the driver licensing technology support account created under RCW 46.68.067. The moneys deposited into the driver licensing technology support account must be used to support information technology systems used by the department to communicate with the judicial information system, manage driving records, and implement court orders. The balance of the revenue received by the county or city treasurer under this subsection must be deposited into the county or city current expense fund. Moneys retained by the city or county under this subsection shall constitute reimbursement for any liabilities under RCW 43.135.060.(9) If a legal proceeding, such as garnishment, has commenced to collect any delinquent amount owed by the person for any penalty imposed by the court under this section, the person may request a payment plan pursuant to RCW 46.63.190.(10) The monetary penalty for violating RCW 46.37.395 is: (a) $250 for the first violation; (b) $500 for the second violation; and (c) $750 for each violation thereafter.(11) The additional monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.20.500 is not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.(12) The additional monetary fine for a violation of RCW 46.61.110, 46.61.145, 46.61.180, 46.61.185, 46.61.190, and 46.61.205 is not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.(13) The additional monetary penalties for a violation of RCW 46.61.165 are not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.(14) The monetary penalty for a violation of RCW 46.63.200 is not subject to assessments or fees provided under this section.Sec. 3. RCW 74.31.040 and 2011 c 143 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:In collaboration with the council, the department shall conduct a public awareness campaign that utilizes funding from the traumatic brain injury account to leverage a private advertising campaign to persuade Washington residents to be aware and concerned about the issues facing individuals with traumatic brain injuries through all forms of media including internet, television, radio, and print. The public awareness campaign must also include information on the availability and benefits of in-person peer support groups, community integration programs, and other services designed to assist individuals with traumatic brain injuries and their families.Sec. 4. RCW 74.31.050 and 2011 c 143 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall provide funding from the traumatic brain injury account established by RCW 74.31.060 to programs that facilitate support groups to individuals with traumatic brain injuries and their families.(2) The department shall use a request for proposal process to select the programs to receive funding. The council shall provide recommendations to the department on the criteria to be used in selecting the programs.(3) At least 30 percent of the annual expenditures from the traumatic brain injury account must be allocated to in-person support groups and community integration activities. The department shall ensure that funds dedicated to in-person support groups, the expansion of structured programs that facilitate direct peer-to-peer connection for individuals and family members impacted by traumatic brain injuries, and community integration programs prioritize peer engagement and are not disproportionately allocated to virtual-only support structures or other department-affiliated programs that do not. The council shall review and approve annual funding proposals for in-person support and community integration programs to ensure transparency and adherence to legislative intent. The department shall make every effort to disburse the incremental revenue that is the result of the fee under RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) or federal funds under RCW 74.31.060(2) in a diverse manner to include rural areas of the state.Sec. 5. RCW 74.31.060 and 2019 c 181 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The traumatic brain injury account is created in the state treasury. The fee imposed under RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation, and may be used only to support the activities in the statewide traumatic brain injury comprehensive plan, to provide a public awareness campaign and services relating to traumatic brain injury under RCW 74.31.040 and 74.31.050, for information and referral services, and for costs of required department staff who are providing support for the council under RCW 74.31.020 and 74.31.030. Additionally, at least 30 percent of the annual expenditures from the account must be for in-person support groups and community integration activities that promote social connections between individuals impacted by traumatic brain injury. The secretary of the department of social and health services ((has the authority to))shall administer the funds in alignment with the priorities outlined in this section and ensure compliance with all allocation requirements. The department must make every effort to disburse the incremental revenue that is the result of the fee increased under RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) in a diverse manner to include rural areas of the state.(2) The department shall proactively seek, apply for, and secure federal funding opportunities, including but not limited to grants available through the administration for community living and other federal programs. These efforts must be conducted in coordination with the council and in alignment with the council's mission and priorities. Federal funds obtained pursuant to this subsection must supplement the fee amounts collected pursuant to RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) and must be deposited into the traumatic brain injury account. The department shall ensure that any federal funds received enhance, rather than supplant, existing state funding dedicated to in-person support groups, community integration activities, and peer-to-peer recovery initiatives.(3) A minimum of 30 percent of the annual fee revenue collected under RCW 46.63.110(7)(c) must be used exclusively for:(a) Establishing and maintaining peer led and community-based in-person support groups for individuals with a traumatic brain injury and their families;(b) Developing structured skills-building programs designed to promote social integration and functional recovery for individuals of all ages, including pediatric-focused initiatives;(c) Supporting initiatives that provide direct peer-to-peer mentoring and navigation assistance for newly injured individuals and their families, including hospital-to-community transition support; and(d) Ensuring equitable access to support groups and community-based programs across urban and rural regions.--- END ---